Utah statutes.
53A-1a-502.5.    Approval of increase in charter school enrollment capacity.

(1) (a)  The State Board of Education may approve an increase in charter school enrollment capacity in the 2012-13 school year or thereafter subject to the Legislature appropriating funds for the increase in charter school enrollment capacity.

(b)  A charter school shall submit a request for an increase in enrollment capacity pursuant to Subsection (2)(a) on or before October 1 of the school year for which the increase in enrollment capacity is requested.

(2) (a)  A charter school may annually submit a request to the State Board of Education for an increase in enrollment capacity in the amount of .25 times the number of students in grades 9 through 12 enrolled in an online course in the previous school year through the Statewide Online Education Program.

(b)  The State Board of Education shall approve an increase in enrollment capacity made under Subsection (2)(a) subject to the availability of sufficient funds appropriated under Section 53A-1a-513 to provide the full amount of the per student allocation for each charter school student in the state to supplement school district property tax revenues.

(c)  An increase in enrollment capacity approved under Subsection (2)(b) shall be a permanent increase in the charter school's enrollment capacity.

(3) (a)  If the Legislature does not appropriate funds for an increase in charter school enrollment capacity that is tentatively approved by the State Board of Education, the State Board of Education shall prioritize the tentatively approved schools and expansions based on approved funds.

(b)  A charter school or expansion that is tentatively approved, but not funded, shall be considered to be tentatively approved for the next application year and receive priority status for available funding.



Amended by Chapter 139, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 414, 2012 General Session

